Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1,111
Forced sale; disposition of certain proceeds.

In any forced sale of real or personal property conducted to satisfy the claims of creditors, any proceeds of such sale which exceed the claims of such creditors shall be retained by the debtor.

Laws 1987, LB 335, § 3.